North Dakota, session 69, HB1139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 57-39.2-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Gross receipts from sales when made to a fire department for the purpose of providing fire
protection services. For purposes of this subsection, "fire department" means a fire
department or fire district that has filed a certificate of existence under section 18 - 04 - 02 which
has been approved.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable events occurring after June 30,
2025.

H. B. NO. 1139 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1139.
House Vote: Yeas 49 Nays 38 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State